Illinois, session 104th, SB1764.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Sections 2605-10, 2605-40, 2605-51, 2605-54, and 2605-355, 72605-615 and by adding Section 2605-490 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-10)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part)9    Sec. 2605-10. Powers and duties, generally. 10    (a) The Illinois State Police shall exercise the rights, 11powers, and duties that have been vested in the Illinois State 12Police by the following:13        The Illinois State Police Act.14        The Illinois State Police Radio Act.15        The Criminal Identification Act.16        The Illinois Vehicle Code.17        The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.18        The Firearm Concealed Carry Act.19        The Firearm Dealer License Certification Act.20        The Intergovernmental Missing Child Recovery Act of 21    1984.22        The Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement Act.23        The Narcotic Control Division Abolition Act.  SB1764 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        The Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act.2        The Murderer and Violent Offender Against Youth 3    Registration Act. 4    (b) The Illinois State Police shall have the powers and 5duties set forth in the following Sections. The Illinois State 6Police may receive revenue and real and personal property from 7any legal source, grants, pass-through grants, donations, and 8lawful appropriations. 9    (c) The Illinois State Police shall exercise the rights, 10powers, and duties vested in the Illinois State Police to 11implement the following protective service functions for State 12facilities, State officials, and State employees serving in 13their official capacity: 14        (1) Utilize subject matter expertise and law 15    enforcement authority to strengthen the protection of 16    State government facilities, State employees, State 17    officials, and State critical infrastructure. 18        (2) Coordinate State, federal, and local law 19    enforcement activities involving the protection of State 20    facilities, officials, and employees. 21        (3) Conduct investigations of criminal threats to 22    State facilities, State critical infrastructure, State 23    officials, and State employees. 24        (4) Train State officials and employees in personal 25    protection, crime prevention, facility occupant emergency 26    planning, and incident management.   SB1764 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (5) Establish standard protocols for prevention and 2    response to criminal threats to State facilities, State 3    officials, State employees, and State critical 4    infrastructure and standard protocols for reporting of 5    suspicious activities. 6        (6) Establish minimum operational standards, 7    qualifications, training, and compliance requirements for 8    State employees and contractors engaged in the protection 9    of State facilities and employees. 10        (7) At the request of departments or agencies of State 11    government, conduct security assessments, including, but 12    not limited to, examination of alarm systems, cameras 13    systems, access points, personnel readiness, and emergency 14    protocols based on risk and need. 15        (8) Oversee the planning and implementation of 16    security and law enforcement activities necessary for the 17    protection of major, multi-jurisdictional events 18    implicating potential criminal threats to State officials, 19    State employees, or State-owned, State-leased, or 20    State-operated critical infrastructure or facilities. 21        (9) Oversee and direct the planning and implementation 22    of security and law enforcement activities by the 23    departments and agencies of the State necessary for the 24    protection of State employees, State officials, and 25    State-owned, State-leased, or State-operated critical 26    infrastructure or facilities from criminal activity.   SB1764 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (10) Advise the Governor and Homeland Security Advisor 2    on any matters necessary for the effective protection of 3    State facilities, critical infrastructure, officials, and 4    employees from criminal threats. 5        (11) Utilize intergovernmental agreements and 6    administrative rules as needed for the effective, 7    efficient implementation of law enforcement and support 8    activities necessary for the protection of State 9    facilities, State infrastructure, State employees, and, 10    upon the express written consent of State constitutional 11    officials, State constitutional officials. 12(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 13103-564, eff. 11-17-23.) 14    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-40)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-4)15    Sec. 2605-40. Division of Forensic Services. The Division 16of Forensic Services shall exercise the following functions:17        (1) Provide crime scene services and traffic crash 18    reconstruction and examine digital evidence.19        (2) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested by 20    law in the Illinois State Police by Section 2605-300 of 21    this Law.22        (3) Provide assistance to local law enforcement 23    agencies through training, management, and consultant 24    services.25        (4) (Blank).  SB1764 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (5) Exercise other duties that may be assigned by the 2    Director in order to fulfill the responsibilities and 3    achieve the purposes of the Illinois State Police.4        (6) Establish and operate a forensic science 5    laboratory system, including a forensic toxicological 6    laboratory service, for the purpose of testing specimens 7    submitted by coroners and other law enforcement officers 8    in their efforts to determine whether alcohol, drugs, or 9    poisonous or other toxic substances have been involved in 10    deaths, accidents, or illness. Forensic laboratories shall 11    be established in Springfield, Chicago, and elsewhere in 12    the State as needed.13        (6.5) Establish administrative rules in order to set 14    forth standardized requirements for the disclosure of 15    toxicology results and other relevant documents related to 16    a toxicological analysis. These administrative rules are 17    to be adopted to produce uniform and sufficient 18    information to allow a proper, well-informed determination 19    of the admissibility of toxicology evidence and to ensure 20    that this evidence is presented competently. These 21    administrative rules are designed to provide a minimum 22    standard for compliance of toxicology evidence and are not 23    intended to limit the production and discovery of material 24    information.25        (7) Subject to specific appropriations made for these 26    purposes, establish and coordinate a system for providing   SB1764 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    accurate and expedited forensic science and other 2    investigative and laboratory services to local law 3    enforcement agencies and local State's Attorneys in aid of 4    the investigation and trial of capital cases.5        (8) Exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested by 6    law in the Illinois State Police under the Sexual Assault 7    Evidence Submission Act and the Sexual Assault Survivors 8    Emergency Treatment Act.9        (9) Serve as the State central repository for all 10    genetic marker grouping analysis information and exercise 11    the rights, powers, and duties vested by law in the 12    Illinois State Police under Section 5-4-3 of the Unified 13    Code of Corrections.14        (10) Issue reports required under Section 5-4-3a of 15    the Unified Code of Corrections.16        (11) Oversee the Electronic Laboratory Information 17    Management System under Section 5-4-3b of the Unified Code 18    of Corrections.19        (12) Issue reports as required under Section 115-15 of 20    the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.21        (13) Oversee the training required under subparagraph 22    (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Section 10 of the 23    Missing Person Identification Act.24        (14) Provide information to local law enforcement 25    agencies about best practices for handling death scene 26    investigations as provided under paragraph (1) of   SB1764 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    subsection (a) of Section 15 of the Missing Person 2    Identification Act. 3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 4103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 5    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-51)6    Sec. 2605-51. Division of the Academy and Training.7    (a) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 8exercise, but not be limited to, the following functions:9        (1) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police 10    Training Academy.11        (2) Train and prepare new officers for a career in law 12    enforcement, with innovative, quality training and 13    educational practices.14        (3) Offer continuing training and educational programs 15    for Illinois State Police employees.16        (4) Oversee the Illinois State Police's recruitment 17    initiatives.18        (5) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police's 19    quartermaster.20        (6) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 21    Article 5, Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code 22    concerning testing and training officers on the detection 23    of impaired driving.24        (7) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 25    Article 108B of the Code of Criminal Procedure.   SB1764 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    (a-5) Successful completion of the Illinois State Police 2Academy satisfies the minimum standards pursuant to 3subsections (a), (b), and (d) of Section 7 of the Illinois 4Police Training Act and exempts Illinois State Police State 5police officers from the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 6Standards Board's State Comprehensive Examination and 7Equivalency Examination. Satisfactory completion shall be 8evidenced by a commission or certificate issued to the 9officer. 10    (b) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 11exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested in the former 12Division of State Troopers by Section 17 of the Illinois State 13Police Act.14    (c) Specialized training. The Division of the Academy and 15Training shall provide the following specialized training: 16        (1) Crash reconstruction specialist; training. The 17    Division of the Academy and Training shall cooperate with 18    the Division of Forensic Services to provide specialized 19    training in crash reconstruction for Illinois State Police 20    officers. Only Illinois State Police officers who 21    successfully complete the training may be assigned as 22    crash reconstruction specialists. Training; cultural 23    diversity. The Division of the Academy and Training shall 24    provide training and continuing education to State police 25    officers concerning cultural diversity, including 26    sensitivity toward racial and ethnic differences. This   SB1764 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    training and continuing education shall include, but not 2    be limited to, an emphasis on the fact that the primary 3    purpose of enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code is 4    safety and equal and uniform enforcement under the law.5        (2) Death Training; death and homicide investigations; 6    training. The Division of the Academy and Training shall 7    provide training in death and homicide investigation for 8    Illinois State Police police officers. Only Illinois State 9    Police police officers who successfully complete the 10    training may be assigned as lead investigators in death 11    and homicide investigations. Satisfactory completion of 12    the training shall be evidenced by a certificate issued to 13    the officer by the Division of the Academy and Training. 14    The Director shall develop a process for waiver 15    applications for officers whose prior training and 16    experience as homicide investigators may qualify them for 17    a waiver. The Director may issue a waiver, at his or her 18    discretion, based solely on the prior training and 19    experience of an officer as a homicide investigator.20            (A) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 21        require all homicide investigator training to include 22        instruction on victim-centered, trauma-informed 23        investigation. This training must be implemented by 24        July 1, 2023.25            (B) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 26        cooperate with the Division of Criminal Investigation   SB1764 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        to develop a model curriculum on victim-centered, 2        trauma-informed investigation. This curriculum must be 3        implemented by July 1, 2023. 4        (3) Investigation of officer-involved criminal sexual 5    assault; training. The Division of the Academy and 6    Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 7    Investigation to provide a specialized criminal sexual 8    assault and sexual abuse investigation training program 9    for Illinois State Police officers. Only Illinois State 10    Police officers who successfully complete the training may 11    be assigned as investigators in officer-involved criminal 12    sexual assault investigations under Section 10 of the Law 13    Enforcement Criminal Sexual Assault Investigation Act. 14        (4) Investigation of officer-involved deaths; 15    training. The Division of the Academy and Training shall 16    have a written policy regarding the investigation of 17    officer-involved deaths that involve a law enforcement 18    officer employed by the Illinois State Police as required 19    under Section 1-10 of the Police and Community Relations 20    Improvement Act and shall provide specialized training in 21    that policy for Illinois State Police officers. 22        (5) Juvenile specialist; training. The Division of the 23    Academy and Training shall provide specialized juvenile 24    training for Illinois State Police officers who meet the 25    definition of "juvenile police officer" as defined under 26    paragraph (17) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of   SB1764 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    1987. Juvenile specialists may complete questioning of 2    juveniles on school grounds as provided under Section 3    22-88 of the School Code. 4        (6) Peer support program; training. The Division of 5    the Academy and Training shall cooperate with the Office 6    of the Director to provide peer support advisors with 7    appropriate specialized training in counseling to conduct 8    peer support counseling sessions under Section 10 of the 9    First Responders Suicide Prevention Act. 10        (7) Police (3) Training; police dog training 11    standards; training. All police dogs used by the Illinois 12    State Police for drug enforcement purposes pursuant to the 13    Cannabis Control Act, the Illinois Controlled Substances 14    Act, and the Methamphetamine Control and Community 15    Protection Act shall be trained by programs that meet the 16    certification requirements set by the Director or the 17    Director's designee. Satisfactory completion of the 18    training shall be evidenced by a certificate issued by the 19    Division of the Academy and Training.20        (4) Training; post-traumatic stress disorder. The 21    Division of the Academy and Training shall conduct or 22    approve a training program in post-traumatic stress 23    disorder for State police officers. The purpose of that 24    training shall be to equip State police officers to 25    identify the symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder 26    and to respond appropriately to individuals exhibiting   SB1764 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    those symptoms.2        (5) Training; opioid antagonists. The Division of the 3    Academy and Training shall conduct or approve a training 4    program for State police officers in the administration of 5    opioid antagonists as defined in paragraph (1) of 6    subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the Substance Use 7    Disorder Act that is in accordance with that Section. As 8    used in this Section, "State police officers" includes 9    full-time or part-time State police officers, 10    investigators, and any other employee of the Illinois 11    State Police exercising the powers of a peace officer.12        (6) Training; sexual assault and sexual abuse.13            (A) Every 3 years, the Division of the Academy and 14        Training shall present in-service training on sexual 15        assault and sexual abuse response and report writing 16        training requirements, including, but not limited to, 17        the following:18                (i) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;19                (ii) understanding the role trauma has played 20            in a victim's life;21                (iii) responding to the needs and concerns of 22            a victim;23                (iv) delivering services in a compassionate, 24            sensitive, and nonjudgmental manner;25                (v) interviewing techniques in accordance with 26            the curriculum standards in this paragraph (6);  SB1764 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1                (vi) understanding cultural perceptions and 2            common myths of sexual assault and sexual abuse; 3            and4                (vii) report writing techniques in accordance 5            with the curriculum standards in this paragraph 6            (6).7            (B) This training must also be presented in all 8        full and part-time basic law enforcement academies.9            (C) Instructors providing this training shall have 10        successfully completed training on evidence-based, 11        trauma-informed, victim-centered responses to cases of 12        sexual assault and sexual abuse and have experience 13        responding to sexual assault and sexual abuse cases.14            (D) The Illinois State Police shall adopt rules, 15        in consultation with the Office of the Attorney 16        General and the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 17        Standards Board, to determine the specific training 18        requirements for these courses, including, but not 19        limited to, the following:20                (i) evidence-based curriculum standards for 21            report writing and immediate response to sexual 22            assault and sexual abuse, including 23            trauma-informed, victim-centered interview 24            techniques, which have been demonstrated to 25            minimize retraumatization, for all State police 26            officers; and  SB1764 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1                (ii) evidence-based curriculum standards for 2            trauma-informed, victim-centered investigation 3            and interviewing techniques, which have been 4            demonstrated to minimize retraumatization, for 5            cases of sexual assault and sexual abuse for all 6            State police officers who conduct sexual assault 7            and sexual abuse investigations.8        (7) Training; human trafficking. The Division of the 9    Academy and Training shall conduct or approve a training 10    program in the detection and investigation of all forms of 11    human trafficking, including, but not limited to, 12    involuntary servitude under subsection (b) of Section 10-9 13    of the Criminal Code of 2012, involuntary sexual servitude 14    of a minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of the 15    Criminal Code of 2012, and trafficking in persons under 16    subsection (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 17    2012. This program shall be made available to all cadets 18    and State police officers.19        (8) Safe2Help; training. The Division of the Academy 20    and Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 21    Investigation to ensure all program personnel or call 22    center staff, or both, are appropriately trained in the 23    areas described in subsection (f) of Section 10 of the 24    Student Confidential Reporting Act. Training; hate crimes. 25    The Division of the Academy and Training shall provide 26    training for State police officers in identifying,   SB1764 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    responding to, and reporting all hate crimes.2        (9) Training; cell phone medical information. The 3    Division of the Academy and Training shall develop and 4    require each State police officer to complete training on 5    accessing and utilizing medical information stored in cell 6    phones. The Division may use the program approved under 7    Section 2310-711 of the Department of Public Health Powers 8    and Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 9    Illinois to develop the Division's program. 10        (9) Training; autism spectrum disorders. The Division 11    of the Academy and Training shall provide training for 12    State police officers on the nature of autism spectrum 13    disorders and in identifying and appropriately responding 14    to individuals with autism spectrum disorders. The 15    Illinois State Police shall review the training curriculum 16    and may consult with the Department of Public Health or 17    the Department of Human Services to update the training 18    curriculum as needed. This training shall be made 19    available to all cadets and State police officers.20    (c-5) In-service training.21        (1) At least once, the Division of the Academy and 22    Training shall develop and require the following 23    in-service training opportunities to be completed by 24    Illinois State Police officers:25            (A) Cell phone medical information; training. 26        Training required under this subparagraph (A) shall   SB1764 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        provide instruction on accessing and using medical 2        information stored in cell phones. The Division may 3        use the program approved under Section 2310-711 of the 4        Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of 5        the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to develop 6        the Division's program.7            (B) Autism spectrum disorders; training. Training 8        required under this subparagraph (B) shall instruct 9        Illinois State Police officers on the nature of autism 10        spectrum disorders and in identifying and 11        appropriately responding to individuals with autism 12        spectrum disorders. The Illinois State Police shall 13        review the training curriculum and may consult with 14        the Department of Public Health or the Department of 15        Human Services to update the training curriculum as 16        needed.17        (2) At least every year, the Division of the Academy 18    and Training shall provide the following in-service 19    training to Illinois State Police officers:20            (A) Cultural diversity; training.21                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 22            (A) shall provide training and continuing 23            education to Illinois State Police officers 24            concerning cultural diversity, including topics 25            such as sensitivity toward racial and ethnic 26            differences.  SB1764 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1                (ii) This training and continuing education 2            shall, among other things, emphasize that the 3            primary purpose of enforcement of the Illinois 4            Vehicle Code is safety and equal, uniform, and 5            non-discriminatory enforcement of the law.6            (B) Minimum annual in-service training 7        requirements. Minimum annual in-service training 8        includes:9                (i) crisis intervention training;10                (ii) emergency medical response training and 11            certification;12                (iii) firearm qualification training;13                (iv) law updates; and14                (v) officer wellness and mental health.15            (C) Firearms restraining orders; training. 16        Training required under this subparagraph (C) shall 17        provide instruction on the processes used to file a 18        firearms restraining order, to identify situations in 19        which a firearms restraining order is appropriate, and 20        to safely promote the usage of the firearms 21        restraining order in different situations.22        (3) At least every 3 years, the Division of the 23    Academy and Training shall provide the following 24    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:25            (A) Arrest and use of force and control tactics; 26        training. Training required under this subparagraph   SB1764 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (A) shall provide to Illinois State Police officers 2        training and continuing education concerning knowledge 3        of policies and laws regulating the use of force; 4        shall equip officers with tactics and skills, 5        including de-escalation techniques, to prevent or 6        reduce the need to use force or, when force must be 7        used, to use force that is objectively reasonable, 8        necessary, and proportional under the totality of the 9        circumstances; and shall ensure appropriate 10        supervision and accountability. The training shall 11        consist of at least 30 hours and shall include:12                (i) at least 12 hours of hands-on, 13            scenario-based role-playing;14                (ii) at least 6 hours of instruction on use of 15            force techniques, including the use of 16            de-escalation techniques to prevent or reduce the 17            need for force whenever safe and feasible;18                (iii) specific training on the law concerning 19            stops, searches, and the use of force under the 20            Fourth Amendment to the United States 21            Constitution;22                (iv) specific training on officer safety 23            techniques, including cover, concealment, and 24            time; and25                (v) at least 6 hours of training focused on 26            high-risk traffic stops.  SB1764 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1            (B) Minimum triennial in-service training 2        requirements. Minimum triennial in-service training 3        required this under subparagraph (B) includes training 4        and continuing education to Illinois State Police 5        officers concerning:6                (i) constitutional and proper use of law 7            enforcement authority;8                (ii) civil and human rights;9                (iii) cultural competency, including implicit 10            bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity; and11                (iv) procedural justice.12            (C) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 13        under this subparagraph (C) must be approved by the 14        Department of Children and Family Services as provided 15        under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 16        Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting 17        of child abuse and neglect.18            (D) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training.19                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 20            (D) shall include in-service training on sexual 21            assault and sexual abuse response and training on 22            report writing requirements, including, but not 23            limited to, the following:24                    (a) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;25                    (b) understanding the role trauma has 26                played in a victim's life;  SB1764 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1                    (c) responding to the needs and concerns 2                of a victim;3                    (d) delivering services in a 4                compassionate, sensitive, and nonjudgmental 5                manner;6                    (e) interviewing techniques in accordance 7                with the curriculum standards in subdivision 8                (iii) of this subparagraph;9                    (f) understanding cultural perceptions and 10                common myths of sexual assault and sexual 11                abuse; and12                    (g) report writing techniques in 13                accordance with the curriculum standards in 14                subdivision (iii) of this subparagraph and the 15                Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.16                (ii) Instructors providing training under this 17            subparagraph (G) shall have successfully completed 18            training on evidence-based, trauma-informed, 19            victim-centered responses to cases of sexual 20            assault and sexual abuse and shall have experience 21            responding to sexual assault and sexual abuse 22            cases.23                (iii) The Illinois State Police shall adopt 24            rules, in consultation with the Office of the 25            Attorney General and the Illinois Law Enforcement 26            Training Standards Board, to determine the   SB1764 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1            specific training requirements. The rules adopted 2            by the Illinois State Police shall include, at a 3            minimum, both of the following:4                    (a) evidence-based curriculum standards 5                for report writing and immediate response to 6                sexual assault and sexual abuse, including 7                trauma-informed, victim-centered interview 8                techniques, which have been demonstrated to 9                minimize retraumatization, for all Illinois 10                State Police officers; and11                    (b) evidence-based curriculum standards 12                for trauma-informed, victim-centered 13                investigation and interviewing techniques, 14                which have been demonstrated to minimize 15                retraumatization, for cases of sexual assault 16                and sexual abuse for all Illinois State Police 17                officers who conduct sexual assault and sexual 18                abuse investigations.19        (4) At least every 5 years, the Division of the 20    Academy and Training shall provide the following 21    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:22            (A) Psychology of domestic violence; training. 23        Training under this subparagraph (A) shall provide aid 24        in understanding the actions of domestic violence 25        victims and abusers and the actions needed to prevent 26        further victimization of those who have been abused.   SB1764 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        The training shall focus specifically on looking 2        beyond physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 3        violence situations by studying the dynamics of the 4        aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 5        claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 6        assessing the long-term effects of domestic violence 7        situations.8    (c-10) Cadet training. The Division of the Academy and 9Training shall provide the following basic training to 10Illinois State Police cadets or ensure the following training 11was completed prior to an Illinois State Police cadet becoming 12an Illinois State Police officer:13        (1) Animal fighting awareness and humane response; 14    training. Training required under this paragraph (1) shall 15    include a training program in animal fighting awareness 16    and humane response for Illinois State Police cadets. The 17    purpose of that training shall be for Illinois State 18    Police officers to identify animal fighting operations and 19    respond appropriately. Training under this paragraph (1) 20    shall include a humane response component that provides 21    guidelines for appropriate law enforcement response to 22    animal abuse, cruelty, and neglect, or similar condition, 23    as well as training on canine behavior and nonlethal ways 24    to subdue a canine.25        (2) Arrest and use of force and control tactics and 26    officer safety; training. Training required under this   SB1764 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    paragraph (2) must include, without limitation, training 2    on officer safety techniques, such as cover, concealment, 3    and time.4        (3) Arrest of a parent or an immediate family member; 5    training. Training required under this paragraph (3) shall 6    instruct Illinois State Police cadets on trauma-informed 7    responses designed to ensure the physical safety and 8    well-being of a child of an arrested parent or immediate 9    family member, which must include, without limitation: (A) 10    training in understanding the trauma experienced by the 11    child while maintaining the integrity of the arrest and 12    safety of officers, suspects, and other involved 13    individuals; (B) training in de-escalation tactics that 14    would include the use of force when reasonably necessary; 15    and (C) training in understanding and inquiring whether a 16    child will require supervision and care.17        (4) Autism and other developmental or physical 18    disabilities; training. Training required under this 19    paragraph (4) shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets 20    on identifying and interacting with persons with autism 21    and other developmental or physical disabilities, reducing 22    barriers to reporting crimes against persons with autism, 23    and addressing the unique challenges presented by cases 24    involving victims or witnesses with autism and other 25    developmental disabilities.26        (5) Cell phone medical information; training. Training   SB1764 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    required under this paragraph (5) shall instruct Illinois 2    State Police cadets to access and use medical information 3    stored in cell phones. The Division of the Academy and 4    Training may use the program approved under Section 5    2310-711 of the Department of Public Health Powers and 6    Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to 7    develop the training required under this paragraph (5). 8        (6) Compliance with the Health Care Violence 9    Prevention Act; training. Training required under this 10    paragraph (6) shall provide an appropriate level of 11    training for Illinois State Police cadets concerning the 12    Health Care Violence Prevention Act.13        (7) Constitutional law; training. Training required 14    under this paragraph (7) shall instruct Illinois State 15    Police cadets on constitutional and proper use of law 16    enforcement authority, procedural justice, civil rights, 17    human rights, and cultural competency, including implicit 18    bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity.19        (8) Courtroom testimony; training.20        (9) Crime victims; training. Training required under 21    this paragraph (9) shall provide instruction in techniques 22    designed to promote effective communication at the initial 23    contact with crime victims and to comprehensively explain 24    to victims and witnesses their rights under the Rights of 25    Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims 26    Compensation Act.  SB1764 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (10) Criminal law; training.2        (11) Crisis intervention team and mental health 3    awareness; training. Training required under this 4    paragraph (11) shall include a specialty certification 5    course of at least 40 hours, addressing specialized 6    policing responses to people with mental illnesses. The 7    Division of the Academy and Training shall conduct Crisis 8    Intervention Team training programs that train officers to 9    identify signs and symptoms of mental illness, to 10    de-escalate situations involving individuals who appear to 11    have a mental illness and connect individuals in crisis to 12    treatment.13        (12) Cultural diversity; training.14            (A) The training required under this paragraph 15        (12) shall provide training to Illinois State Police 16        cadets concerning cultural competency and cultural 17        diversity, including sensitivity toward racial and 18        ethnic differences.19            (B) This training shall include, but not be 20        limited to, an emphasis on the fact that the primary 21        purpose of enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code is 22        safety, equal, and uniform and non-discriminatory 23        enforcement under the law.24        (13) De-escalation and use of force; training. 25    Training required under this paragraph (13) must consist 26    of at least 6 hours of instruction on use of force   SB1764 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    techniques, including the use of de-escalation techniques 2    to prevent or reduce the need for force whenever safe and 3    feasible.4        (14) Domestic violence; training. Training required 5    under this paragraph (14) shall provide aid in 6    understanding the actions of domestic violence victims and 7    abusers and to prevent further victimization of those who 8    have been abused, focusing specifically on looking beyond 9    the physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 10    violence situations, such as the dynamics of the 11    aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 12    claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 13    long-term effects.14        (15) Effective recognition of and responses to stress, 15    trauma, and post-traumatic stress; training. Training 16    required under this paragraph (15) shall instruct Illinois 17    State Police cadets to recognize and respond to stress, 18    trauma, and post-traumatic stress experienced by law 19    enforcement officers. The training must be consistent with 20    Section 25 of the Illinois Mental Health First Aid 21    Training Act in a peer setting, including recognizing 22    signs and symptoms of work-related cumulative stress, 23    issues that may lead to suicide, and solutions for 24    intervention with peer support resources.25        (16) Elder abuse; training. Training required under 26    this paragraph (16) shall teach Illinois State Police   SB1764 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    cadets to recognize neglect and financial exploitation 2    against the elderly and adults with disabilities. The 3    training shall also teach Illinois State Police cadets to 4    recognize self-neglect by the elderly and adults with 5    disabilities. In this subparagraph, "adults with 6    disabilities" has the meaning given to that term in the 7    Adult Protective Services Act.8        (17) Electronic control devices; training. Training 9    required under this paragraph (17) shall include training 10    in the use of electronic control devices, including the 11    psychological and physiological effects of the use of 12    those devices on humans.13        (18) Epinephrine auto-injector administration; 14    training. Training required under this paragraph (18) 15    shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to recognize 16    and respond to anaphylaxis. The training must comply with 17    subsection (c) of Section 40 of the Illinois State Police 18    Act.19        (19) Evidence collection; training. Training required 20    under this paragraph (19) must include proper procedures 21    for collecting, handling, and preserving evidence, and 22    rules of law.23        (20) Firearms restraining orders; training. Providing 24    instruction on the process used to file a firearms 25    restraining order and how to identify situations in which 26    a firearms restraining order is appropriate and how to   SB1764 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    safely promote the usage of the firearms restraining order 2    in different situations.3        (21) Firearms; training. Successful completion of a 4    40-hour course of training in use of a suitable type 5    firearm shall be a condition precedent to the possession 6    and use of that respective firearm in connection with the 7    officer's official duties. To satisfy the requirements of 8    this Act, the training must include the following:9            (A) Instruction in the dangers of misuse of the 10        firearm, safety rules, and care and cleaning of the 11        firearm.12            (B) Practice firing on a range and qualification 13        with the firearm in accordance with the standards 14        established by the Board.15            (C) Instruction in the legal use of firearms under 16        the Criminal Code of 2012 and relevant court 17        decisions.18            (D) A forceful presentation of the ethical and 19        moral considerations assumed by any person who uses a 20        firearm.21        (22) First-aid; training. First-aid training must 22    include cardiopulmonary resuscitation.23        (23) Hate crimes; training. Training required under 24    this paragraph (23) shall instruct Illinois State Police 25    cadets in identifying, responding to, and reporting all 26    hate crimes.  SB1764 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (24) High-risk traffic stops; training. Training 2    required under this paragraph (24) must consist of at 3    least 6 hours of training focused on high-risk traffic 4    stops.5        (25) High-speed vehicle chase; training. Training 6    required under this paragraph (25) shall instruct Illinois 7    State Police cadets on the hazards of high-speed police 8    vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to the 9    high-speed vehicle chase.10        (26) Human relations; training.11        (27) Human trafficking; training. Training required 12    under this paragraph (27) shall instruct Illinois State 13    Police cadets in the detection and investigation of all 14    forms of human trafficking, including, but not limited to, 15    involuntary servitude under subsection (b) of Section 10-9 16    of the Criminal Code of 2012, involuntary sexual servitude 17    of a minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of the 18    Criminal Code of 2012, and trafficking in persons under 19    subsection (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 20    2012. This program shall be made available to all cadets 21    and Illinois State Police officers.22        (28) Juvenile law; training. Training required under 23    this paragraph (28) shall instruct Illinois State Police 24    cadets on juvenile law and the proper processing and 25    handling of juvenile offenders.26        (29) Mandated reporter; training. Training required   SB1764 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    under this paragraph (29) must be approved by the 2    Department of Children and Family Services as provided 3    under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 4    Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting of 5    child abuse and neglect.6        (30) Mental conditions and crises, training. Training 7    required under this paragraph (30) shall include, without 8    limitation, (A) recognizing the disease of addiction, (B) 9    recognizing situations which require immediate assistance, 10    and (C) responding in a manner that safeguards and 11    provides assistance to individuals in need of mental 12    treatment.13        (31) Officer wellness and suicide prevention; 14    training. The training required under this paragraph (31) 15    shall include instruction on job-related stress management 16    techniques, skills for recognizing signs and symptoms of 17    work-related cumulative stress, recognition of other 18    issues that may lead to officer suicide, solutions for 19    intervention, and a presentation on available peer support 20    resources.21        (32) Officer-worn body cameras; training.22            (A) As used in this paragraph (32), "officer-worn 23        body camera" has the meaning given to that term in 24        Article 10 of the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 25        Camera Act.26            (B) The training required under this paragraph   SB1764 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (32) shall provide training in the use of officer-worn 2        body cameras to cadets who will use officer-worn body 3        cameras.4        (33) Opioid antagonists; training.5            (A) As used in this paragraph (33), "opioid 6        antagonist" has the meaning given to that term in 7        subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the Substance Use 8        Disorder Act.9            (B) Training required under this paragraph (33) 10        shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to 11        administer opioid antagonists.12        (34) Persons arrested while under the influence of 13    alcohol or drugs; training. Training required under this 14    paragraph (34) shall comply with Illinois State Police 15    policy adopted under Section 2605-54. The training shall 16    be consistent with the Substance Use Disorder Act and 17    shall provide guidance for the arrest of persons under the 18    influence of alcohol or drugs, proper medical attention if 19    warranted, and care and release of those persons from 20    custody. The training shall provide guidance concerning 21    the release of persons arrested under the influence of 22    alcohol or drugs who are under the age of 21 years of age, 23    which shall include, but shall not be limited to, 24    instructions requiring the arresting officer to make a 25    reasonable attempt to contact a responsible adult who is 26    willing to take custody of the person who is under the   SB1764 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    influence of alcohol or drugs.2        (35) Physical training.3        (36) Post-traumatic stress disorder; training. 4    Training required under this paragraph (36) shall equip 5    Illinois State Police cadets to identify the symptoms of 6    post-traumatic stress disorder and to respond 7    appropriately to individuals exhibiting those symptoms.8        (37) Report writing; training. Training required under 9    this paragraph (37) shall instruct Illinois State Police 10    cadets on writing reports and proper documentation of 11    statements.12        (38) Scenario training. At least 12 hours of hands-on, 13    scenario-based role-playing.14        (39) Search and seizure; training. Training required 15    under this paragraph (39) shall instruct Illinois State 16    Police cadets on search and seizure, including temporary 17    questioning.18        (40) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training. 19    Training required under this paragraph (40) shall instruct 20    Illinois State Police cadets on sexual assault and sexual 21    abuse response and report writing training requirements, 22    including, but not limited to, the following:23            (A) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;24            (B) understanding the role trauma has played in a 25        victim's life;26            (C) responding to the needs and concerns of a   SB1764 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        victim;2            (D) delivering services in a compassionate, 3        sensitive, and nonjudgmental manner;4            (E) interviewing techniques in accordance with the 5        curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 6        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act;7            (F) understanding cultural perceptions and common 8        myths of sexual assault and sexual abuse; and9            (G) report-writing techniques in accordance with 10        the curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 11        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act and the 12        Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.13        (41) Traffic control and crash investigation; 14    training. 15    (d) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 16administer and conduct a program consistent with 18 U.S.C. 17926B and 926C for qualified active and retired Illinois State 18Police officers. 19(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-756, eff. 5-10-22; 20102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-939, eff. 211-1-25; 103-949, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 22    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-54)23    Sec. 2605-54. Training policy; persons Persons arrested 24while under the influence of alcohol or drugs; policy. The 25Illinois State Police shall adopt a policy and provide   SB1764 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1training to State Police officers concerning response and care 2for persons under the influence of alcohol or drugs. The 3policy shall be consistent with the Substance Use Disorder Act 4and shall provide guidance for the arrest of persons under the 5influence of alcohol or drugs, proper medical attention if 6warranted, and care and release of those persons from custody. 7The policy shall provide guidance concerning the release of 8persons arrested under the influence of alcohol or drugs who 9are under the age of 21 years of age which shall include, but 10not be limited to, language requiring the arresting officer to 11make a reasonable attempt to contact a responsible adult who 12is willing to take custody of the person who is under the 13influence of alcohol or drugs.14(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 15    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-355)  (was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part)16    Sec. 2605-355. Delinquent minors; statewide central 17juvenile records system. To develop a separate statewide 18central juvenile records system for persons arrested prior to 19the age of 17 under Section 5-401 of the Juvenile Court Act of 201987 or adjudicated delinquent minors and to make information 21available to local law enforcement officers so that law 22enforcement officers will be able to obtain rapid access to 23the background of the minor from other jurisdictions to the 24end that the juvenile police officers can make appropriate 25decisions that will best serve the interest of the child and   SB1764 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1the community. The Illinois State Police shall submit a 2quarterly report to the General Assembly and Governor. The 3Illinois State Police shall make available on the Illinois 4State Police website a report describing shall contain the 5number of juvenile records that the Illinois State Police has 6received in that quarter and a list, by category, of offenses 7that minors were arrested for or convicted of by age, race, and 8gender.9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-490 new)11    Sec. 2605-490. State Missing Person Clearinghouse. The 12Illinois State Police shall establish a State Missing Persons 13Clearinghouse as a resource to promote an immediate and 14effective community response to missing children as provided 15under Section 40 of the Intergovernmental Missing Child 16Recovery Act of 1984. 17    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-615)18    Sec. 2605-615. Illinois Forensic Science Commission.19    (a) Creation. There is created within the Illinois State 20Police the Illinois Forensic Science Commission.21    (b) Duties and purpose. The Commission shall:22        (1) Provide guidance to ensure the efficient delivery 23    of forensic services and the sound practice of forensic 24    science.  SB1764 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1        (2) Provide a forum for discussions between forensic 2    science stakeholders to improve communication and 3    coordination and to monitor the important issues impacting 4    all stakeholders.5        (3) Take a systems-based approach in reviewing all 6    aspects of the delivery of forensic services and the sound 7    practice of forensic science with the goal of reducing or 8    eliminating the factors and inefficiencies that contribute 9    to backlogs and errors, with a focus on education and 10    training, funding, hiring, procurement, and other aspects 11    identified by the Commission.12        (4) Review significant non-conformities with the sound 13    practice of forensic science documented by each publicly 14    funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic laboratory and offer 15    recommendations for the correction thereof.16        (5) Subject to appropriation, provide educational, 17    research, and professional training opportunities for 18    practicing forensic scientists, police officers, judges, 19    State's Attorneys and Assistant State's Attorneys, Public 20    Defenders, and defense attorneys comporting with the sound 21    practice of forensic science.22        (6) Collect and analyze information related to the 23    impact of current laws, rules, policies, and practices on 24    forensic crime laboratories and the practice of forensic 25    science; evaluate the impact of those laws, rules, 26    policies, and practices on forensic crime laboratories and   SB1764 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    the practice of forensic science; identify new policies 2    and approaches, together with changes in science, and 3    technology; and make recommendations for changes to those 4    laws, rules, policies, and practices that will yield 5    better results in the criminal justice system consistent 6    with the sound practice of forensic science.7        (7) Perform such other studies or tasks pertaining to 8    forensic crime laboratories as may be requested by the 9    General Assembly by resolution or the Governor, and 10    perform such other functions as may be required by law or 11    as are necessary to carry out the purposes and goals of the 12    Commission prescribed in this Section.13        (8) Ensure that adequate resources and facilities are 14    available for carrying out the changes proposed in 15    legislation, rules, or policies and that rational 16    priorities are established for the use of those resources. 17    To do so, the Commission may prepare statements to the 18    Governor and General Assembly identifying the fiscal and 19    practical effects of proposed legislation, rules, or 20    policy changes. Such statements may include, but are not 21    limited to: the impact on present levels of staffing and 22    resources; a professional opinion on the practical value 23    of the change or changes; the increase or decrease the 24    number of crime laboratories; the increase or decrease the 25    cost of operating crime laboratories; the impact on 26    efficiencies and caseloads; other information, including   SB1764 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    but not limited to, facts, data, research, and science 2    relevant to the legislation, rule, or policy; the direct 3    or indirect alteration in any process involving or used by 4    crime laboratories of such proposed legislation, rules, or 5    policy changes; an analysis of the impact, either directly 6    or indirectly, on the technology, improvements, or 7    practices of forensic analyses for use in criminal 8    proceedings; together with the direct or indirect impact 9    on headcount, space, equipment, instruments, 10    accreditation, the volume of cases for analysis, 11    scientific controls, and quality assurance.12    (c) Members. The Commission shall be composed of the 13Director of the Illinois State Police, or his or her designee, 14together with the following members appointed for a term of 4 15years by the Governor with the advice and consent of the 16Senate:17        (1) One crime laboratory director or administrator 18    from each publicly funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic 19    laboratory system.20        (2) One member with experience in the admission of 21    forensic evidence in trials from a statewide association 22    representing prosecutors.23        (3) One member with experience in the admission of 24    forensic evidence in trials from a statewide association 25    representing criminal defense attorneys.26        (4) Three forensic scientists with bench work   SB1764 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    background from various forensic disciplines (e.g., DNA, 2    chemistry, pattern evidence, etc.).3        (5) One retired circuit court judge or associate 4    circuit court judge with criminal trial experience, 5    including experience in the admission of forensic evidence 6    in trials.7        (6) One academic specializing in the field of forensic 8    sciences.9        (7) One or more community representatives (e.g., 10    victim advocates, innocence project organizations, sexual 11    assault examiners, etc.).12        (8) One member who is a medical examiner or coroner. 13    The Governor shall designate one of the members of the 14Commission to serve as the chair of the Commission. Beginning 15January 1, 2026, the Governor shall designate the chair of the 16Commission for a 2-year term. The members of the Commission 17shall elect from their number such other officers as they may 18determine. Members of the Commission shall serve without 19compensation, but may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses 20incurred in the performance of their duties from funds 21appropriated for that purpose.22    (d) Subcommittees. The Commission may form subcommittees 23to study specific issues identified under paragraph (3) of 24subsection (b), including, but not limited to, subcommittees 25on education and training, procurement, funding and hiring. Ad 26hoc subcommittees may also be convened to address other   SB1764 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1issues. Such subcommittees shall meet as needed to complete 2their work, and shall report their findings back to the 3Commission. Subcommittees shall include members of the 4Commission, and may also include non-members such as forensic 5science stakeholders and subject matter experts.6    (e) Meetings. The Commission shall meet quarterly, at the 7call of the chairperson. Facilities for meeting, whether 8remotely or in person, shall be provided for the Commission by 9the Illinois State Police.10    (f) Reporting by publicly funded ISO 17025 accredited 11forensic laboratories. All State and local publicly funded ISO 1217025 accredited forensic laboratory systems, including, but 13not limited to, the DuPage County Forensic Science Center, the 14Northeastern Illinois Regional Crime Laboratory, and the 15Illinois State Police, shall annually provide to the 16Commission a report summarizing its significant 17non-conformities with the efficient delivery of forensic 18services and the sound practice of forensic science. The 19report will identify: each significant non-conformity or 20deficient method; how the non-conformity or deficient method 21was detected; the nature and extent of the non-conformity or 22deficient method; all corrective actions implemented to 23address the non-conformity or deficient method; and an 24analysis of the effectiveness of the corrective actions taken.25    (g) Definition. As used in this Section, "Commission" 26means the Illinois Forensic Science Commission.  SB1764 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1(Source: P.A. 102-523, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 2103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 3    Section 10. The Illinois State Police Act is amended by 4changing Section 35, 40, and 45 as follows: 5    (20 ILCS 2610/35)6    Sec. 35. Officer-worn body cameras; policy; training.7    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "officer-worn body 8camera" shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 10 of 9the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera Act.10    (b) If the Illinois State Police employs the use of 11officer-worn body cameras, the Illinois State Police shall 12develop a written policy which must include, at a minimum, the 13guidelines established by the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn 14Body Camera Act.15    (c) The Illinois State Police shall provide training to 16those officers who use utilize officer-worn body cameras.17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 18    (20 ILCS 2610/40)19    Sec. 40. Administration Training; administration of 20epinephrine.21    (a) This Section, along with Section 10.19 of the Illinois 22Police Training Act, may be referred to as the Annie LeGere 23Law.   SB1764 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    (b) For the purposes of this Section, "epinephrine 2auto-injector" means a single-use device used for the 3automatic injection of a pre-measured dose of epinephrine into 4the human body prescribed in the name of the Illinois State 5Police.6    (c) The Illinois State Police may conduct or approve a 7training program for State Police officers to recognize and 8respond to anaphylaxis, including, but not limited to:9        (1) how to recognize symptoms of an allergic reaction;10        (2) how to respond to an emergency involving an 11    allergic reaction;12        (3) how to administer an epinephrine auto-injector;13        (4) how to respond to an individual with a known 14    allergy as well as an individual with a previously unknown 15    allergy;16        (5) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 17    required to recognize anaphylaxis and administer an 18    epinephrine auto-injector; and19        (6) other criteria as determined in rules adopted by 20    the Illinois State Police.21    (d) The Illinois State Police may authorize a State Police 22officer who has completed the training program under 23subsection (c) to carry, administer, or assist with the 24administration of epinephrine auto-injectors whenever he or 25she is performing official duties.26    (e) The Illinois State Police must establish a written   SB1764 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1policy to control the acquisition, storage, transportation, 2administration, and disposal of epinephrine auto-injectors 3before it allows any State Police officer to carry and 4administer epinephrine auto-injectors.5    (f) A physician, physician assistant with prescriptive 6authority, or advanced practice registered nurse with 7prescriptive authority may provide a standing protocol or 8prescription for epinephrine auto-injectors in the name of the 9Illinois State Police to be maintained for use when necessary.10    (g) When a State Police officer administers an epinephrine 11auto-injector in good faith, the officer and the Illinois 12State Police, and its employees and agents, including a 13physician, physician assistant with prescriptive authority, or 14advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority 15who provides a standing order or prescription for an 16epinephrine auto-injector, incur no civil or professional 17liability, except for willful and wanton conduct, as a result 18of any injury or death arising from the use of an epinephrine 19auto-injector. 20(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    (20 ILCS 2610/45)22    Sec. 45. Compliance with the Health Care Violence 23Prevention Act; training. The Illinois State Police shall 24comply with the Health Care Violence Prevention Act and shall 25provide an appropriate level of training for its officers   SB1764 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1concerning the Health Care Violence Prevention Act.2(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 3    Section 15. The Volunteer Firefighting Rescue Unit Use Act 4is amended by changing Sections 1 and 2 as follows: 5    (20 ILCS 2625/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 289)6    Sec. 1. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise 7requires, the following terms have the following meanings:8    Rescue unit means a unit of an unpaid volunteer fire 9fighting organization which is specially trained for emergency 10rescue work such as resuscitation of heart attack, drowning, 11suffocation or epilepsy victims, recovery of bodies of 12drowning victims and similar activities;13    Troop District means a geographic geographical area 14designated by the Illinois State Police for administration of 15laws by the Division of Fire Prevention of the Illinois State 16Police.17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 18    (20 ILCS 2625/2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 290)19    Sec. 2. The Illinois State Police may request the 20cooperation and use of facilities of any rescue unit to aid it 21when engaged in any activity designed to save human life or to 22recover the body of a victim. Such a request shall be directed 23to a rescue unit or units located within the district where the   SB1764 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1rescue work is to be performed. If there is no rescue unit 2located within the troop district or if there are not 3sufficient rescue units therein to perform the required work, 4requests may be directed to rescue units located in other 5troops districts.6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 20. The Statewide Organized Gang Database Act is 8amended by changing Sections 5, 10, and 15 as follows: 9    (20 ILCS 2640/5)10    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 12Police.13    "Organized gang" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1410 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention 15Act.16    "LEADS" means the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System, 17which is a statewide communication and processing system that 18permits law enforcement and criminal justice agencies direct 19access to centralized data. 20    A "SWORD terminal" is an interactive computerized 21communication and processing unit that permits a direct 22on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's central 23data repository, the Statewide Organized Gang Database 24(SWORD).  SB1764 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 2    (20 ILCS 2640/10)3    Sec. 10. Duties of the Illinois State Police. The Illinois 4State Police may:5    (a) provide a uniform reporting format for the entry of 6pertinent information regarding the report of an arrested 7organized gang member or organized gang affiliate into LEADS 8SWORD;9    (b) notify all law enforcement agencies that reports of 10arrested organized gang members or organized gang affiliates 11shall be entered into the database as soon as the minimum level 12of data specified by the Illinois State Police is available to 13the reporting agency, and that no waiting period for the entry 14of that data exists;15    (c) develop and implement a policy for notifying law 16enforcement agencies of the emergence of new organized gangs, 17or the change of a name or other identifying sign by an 18existing organized gang;19    (d) compile and retain information regarding organized 20gangs and their members and affiliates, in a manner that 21allows the information to be used by law enforcement and other 22agencies, deemed appropriate by the Director, for 23investigative purposes;24    (e) compile and maintain a historic data repository 25relating to organized gangs and their members and affiliates   SB1764 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1in order to develop and improve techniques utilized by law 2enforcement agencies and prosecutors in the investigation, 3apprehension, and prosecution of members and affiliates of 4organized gangs;5    (f) create a quality control program regarding 6confirmation of organized gang membership and organized gang 7affiliation data, timeliness and accuracy of information 8entered into the LEADS gang file SWORD, and performance audits 9of all entering agencies;10    (g) locate all law enforcement agencies that could, in the 11opinion of the Director, benefit from access to the LEADS gang 12file SWORD, and notify them of its existence; and13    (h) cooperate with all law enforcement agencies wishing to 14gain access to the LEADS SWORD system, and facilitate their 15entry into the system and their continued maintenance of 16access to it.17(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 18    (20 ILCS 2640/15)19    Sec. 15. Duties of local law enforcement agencies. Local 20law enforcement agencies who are members of the LEADS SWORD 21system may:22    (a) after carrying out any arrest of any individual whom 23they believe to be a member or affiliate of an organized gang, 24create or update that individual's electronic file within the 25LEADS SWORD system; and  SB1764 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    (b) notify the prosecutor of the accused of the accused 2individual's gang membership or gang affiliate status.3(Source: P.A. 87-932.) 4    Section 25. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Section 2705-125 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-125)  (was 20 ILCS 2705/49.22)8    Sec. 2705-125. Safety inspection of motor vehicles; 9transfer from various State agencies. The Department has the 10power to administer, exercise, and enforce the rights, powers, 11and duties presently vested in the Illinois State Police and 12the Division of Patrol State Troopers under the Illinois 13Vehicle Inspection Law, in the Illinois Commerce Commission, 14in the State Board of Education, and in the Secretary of State 15under laws relating to the safety inspection of motor vehicles 16operated by common carriers, of school buses, and of motor 17vehicles used in the transportation of school children and 18motor vehicles used in driver exam training schools for hire 19licensed under Article IV of the Illinois Driver Licensing Law 20or under any other law relating to the safety inspection of 21motor vehicles of the second division as defined in the 22Illinois Vehicle Code.23(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB1764 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1    Section 30. The Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement 2Act is amended by changing Section 5.1 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 715/5.1)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1705.1)4    Sec. 5.1. The Director may assign the functions and duties 5created under this Act to be administered by the Illinois 6State Police, Division of Criminal Investigation.7(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    Section 35. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 9changing Section 5-105 as follows: 10    (625 ILCS 5/5-105)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 5-105)11    Sec. 5-105. Investigation of licensee required. Every 12person seeking a license under Chapter 5 of this Act, as part 13of the application process, authorizes an investigation to 14determine if the applicant has ever been convicted of a crime 15and if so, the disposition of those convictions. This 16authorization shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the 17agencies which may be contacted. Upon this authorization the 18Secretary of State may request and receive information and 19assistance from any Federal, State or local governmental 20agency as part of the authorized investigation. The Illinois 21State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 22convictions and their disposition brought against the 23applicant upon request of the Secretary of State when the   SB1764 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1request is made in the form and manner required by the Illinois 2State Police. The information derived from this investigation, 3including the source of this information, and any conclusions 4or recommendations derived from this information by the 5Secretary of State shall be provided to the applicant or his 6designee. Upon request to the Secretary of State prior to any 7final action by the Secretary of State on the application, no 8information obtained from such investigation may be placed in 9any automated information system. Any criminal convictions and 10their disposition information obtained by the Secretary of 11State shall be confidential and may not be transmitted outside 12the Office of the Secretary of State, except as required 13herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone within the Office 14of the Secretary of State except as needed for the purpose of 15evaluating the application. All criminal convictions and their 16disposition and information obtained by the Division of 17Criminal Investigation shall be destroyed no later than 60 18days after the Division of Criminal Investigation has made a 19final ruling on the application, and all rights of appeal have 20expired and pending appeals have been completed. The only 21physical identity materials which the applicant can be 22required to provide the Secretary of State are photographs or 23fingerprints. Only information and standards which bear a 24reasonable and rational relation to the performance of a 25licensee shall be used by the Secretary of State. The 26Secretary of State shall adopt rules and regulations for the   SB1764 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1administration of this Section. Any employee of the Secretary 2of State who gives or causes to be given away any confidential 3information concerning any criminal convictions and their 4disposition of an applicant shall be guilty of a Class A 5misdemeanor.6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 81, 2026.  SB1764 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 03220 RTM 15939 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 2605/2605-10was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part4    20 ILCS 2605/2605-40was 20 ILCS 2605/55a-45    20 ILCS 2605/2605-516    20 ILCS 2605/2605-547    20 ILCS 2605/2605-355was 20 ILCS 2605/55a in part8    20 ILCS 2605/2605-490 new9    20 ILCS 2605/2605-61510    20 ILCS 2610/3511    20 ILCS 2610/4012    20 ILCS 2610/4513    20 ILCS 2625/1from Ch. 127, par. 28914    20 ILCS 2625/2from Ch. 127, par. 29015    20 ILCS 2640/516    20 ILCS 2640/1017    20 ILCS 2640/1518    20 ILCS 2705/2705-125was 20 ILCS 2705/49.2219    30 ILCS 715/5.1from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1705.120    625 ILCS 5/5-105from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 5-105